Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.300

Licenses and reports—Public inspection—Exceptions and requirements—Charges.

All applications for licenses made to the commission, with the exception of any portions of the applications describing the arrest or conviction record of any person, and all reports required by the commission to be filed by its licensees on a periodic basis concerning the operation of the licensed activity or concerning any organization, association, or business in connection with which a licensed activity is operated, in the commission files, shall be open to public inspection at the commission's offices upon a prior written request of the commission. The staff of the commission may decline to allow an inspection until such time as the inspection will not unduly interfere with the other duties of the staff. The commission may charge the person making a request for an inspection an amount necessary to offset the costs to the commission of providing the inspection and copies of any requested documents.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 17.]